test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-talo40_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - talo: # Noun (40) talo 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    talo+N+Sg+Nom: talo
    talo+N+Sg+Gen: talo
    talo+N+Sg+Par: tallo
    talo+N+Sg+Ill: tallo
    talo+N+Sg+Ine: [talon, taloh, talohn]
    talo+N+Sg+Ela: talost
    talo+N+Sg+All: talolõ
    talo+N+Sg+Ade: talol
    talo+N+Sg+Abl: talolt
    talo+N+Sg+Tra: talos
    talo+N+Sg+Ter: taloniq
    talo+N+Sg+Abe: taloldaq
    talo+N+Sg+Com: [talogaq, taloga]
    talo+N+Pl+Nom: taloq
    talo+N+Pl+Gen: [tallõ, talla]
    talo+N+Pl+Par: [tallõ, talla]
    talo+N+Pl+Ill: [tallõhe, tallõ, tallõdõ, tallahe, talla, talladõ]
    talo+N+Pl+Ine: [talõn, talõh, talõhn, tallõn, tallõh, tallõhn, talan, talah, talahn, tallan, tallah, tallahn ]
    talo+N+Pl+Ela: [talõst, tallõst, talast, tallast]
    talo+N+Pl+All: [talõle, tallõlõ, talalõ, tallalõ]
    talo+N+Pl+Ade: [talõl, tallõl, talal, tallal]
    talo+N+Pl+Abl: [talõlt, tallõlt, talalt, tallalt]
    talo+N+Pl+Tra: [talõs, tallõs, talas, tallas]
    talo+N+Pl+Ter: [talõniq, tallõniq, talaniq, tallaniq]
    talo+N+Pl+Abe: [talõldaq, tallõldaq, talaldaq, tallaldaq, talõlda, tallõlda, talalda, tallalda]
    talo+N+Pl+Com: [tallõgaq, tallagaq]
